North Carolina, session 2025, SB443.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 23 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 153A-466. Compensation paid to benefit providers.
Each provider of life, health, or other insurance, or other fringe benefits, including voluntary
benefits, to county employees, dependents of county employees, or persons retired from county
employment shall, on an annual basis, submit to the county a full compensation disclosure of all
funds paid to the provider by the county. For purposes of this section, the term "provider"
includes, but is not limited to, an agent, broker, consultant, third-party administrator, pharmacy
benefits manager, and insurance company. The compensation disclosure shall include all of the
following:
(1) All income paid, directly or indirectly, to the provider, including, but not
limited to, commissions, bonuses, fees, including fees for consulting or
administrative services, and management compensation for shared risk
arrangements in which the county participated for life, health, and other fringe
benefits, including voluntary benefits.
(2) An affirmation that none of the compensation paid by the county has been
provided to any county employee or elected official, directly or indirectly."
SECTION 2. Article 21 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160A-485.1. Compensation paid to benefit providers.
Each provider of life, health, or other insurance, or other fringe benefits, including voluntary
benefits, to city employees, dependents of city employees, or persons retired from city
employment shall, on an annual basis, submit to the city a full compensation disclosure of all
funds paid to the provider by the city. For purposes of this section, the term "provider" includes,
but is not limited to, an agent, broker, consultant, third-party administrator, pharmacy benefits
manager, and insurance company. The compensation disclosure shall include all of the following:
(1) All income paid, directly or indirectly, to the provider, including, but not
limited to, commissions, bonuses, fees, including fees for consulting or
administrative services, and management compensation for shared risk
arrangements in which the city participated for life, health, and other fringe
benefits, including voluntary benefits.
*S443-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An affirmation that none of the compensation paid by the city has been
provided to any city employee or elected official, directly or indirectly."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 443-First Edition